Utah statutes.
4-14-5.   Issuance of experimental use permits -- Application -- Terms and conditions for issuance.

(1) The department upon application may:

(a)  issue an experimental use permit to any person if it determines that the applicant needs such a permit in order to accumulate information necessary to register a pesticide under Section 4-14-3; or

(b)  refuse to issue an experimental permit if it determines that issuance is not warranted or that the pesticide use to be made under the proposed terms and conditions may cause unreasonable adverse effects on the environment.

(2)  The department may also with respect to issuance of an experimental use permit:

(a)  prescribe the terms and conditions for the conduct of the experimental use which in all events shall be under the supervision of the department; and

(b)  revoke or modify any experimental use permit if it determines that the terms or conditions of the experimental use are being violated, or that the terms and conditions prescribed are inadequate to avoid unreasonable adverse effects to the environment.

(3)  Application for an experimental use permit may be made before, after, or simultaneously with an application for registration.

